California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) In a state marine park, it is unlawful to injure, damage, take, or possess any living or nonliving marine resource for commercial exploitation purposes. Any human use that would compromise protection of the species of interest, natural community or habitat, or geological, cultural, or recreational features may be restricted by the designating entity or managing agency. All other uses are allowed, including scientific collection with a permit, research, monitoring, and public recreation, including recreational harvest, unless otherwise restricted. Public use, enjoyment, and education are encouraged, in a manner consistent with protecting resource values.

(c) In a state marine conservation area, it is unlawful to injure, damage, take, or possess any living, geological, or cultural marine resource
 for commercial or recreational purposes, or a combination of commercial and recreational purposes, that the designating entity or managing agency determines would compromise protection of the species of interest, natural community, habitat, or geological features. The designating entity or managing agency may permit research, restoration, monitoring, education, and recreational activities, and certain commercial and recreational harvest of marine resources.

(d) In a state marine cultural preservation area, it is unlawful to damage, take, or possess any cultural marine resource. Complete integrity of the cultural resources shall be sought, and no structure or improvements that conflict with that integrity shall be permitted. No other use is restricted.

(e) In a state marine recreational management area, it is unlawful to perform any activity that, as determined by the designating
 entity or managing agency, would compromise the recreational values for which the area may be designated. Recreational opportunities may be protected, enhanced, or restricted, while preserving basic resource values of the area. No other use is restricted.

(f) In a state water quality protection area, waste discharges shall be prohibited or limited by the imposition of special conditions in accordance with the Porter-Cologne Water Quality Control Act (Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code) and implementing regulations, including, but not limited to, the California Ocean Plan adopted and reviewed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 13160) of Chapter 3 of Division 7 of the Water Code and the Water Quality Control Plan for Control of Temperature in the Coastal and Interstate Waters and Enclosed Bays and Estuaries of California (California Thermal Plan) adopted by the state board. No other use is
 restricted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 368, Sec. 1.   (AB 63)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

36711.

The classifications contained in Section 36710 may not be inconsistent with United States military activities deemed mission critical by the United States military.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 610, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

36725.

(a) The Fish and Game Commission may designate, delete, or modify state marine recreational management areas established by the commission for hunting purposes, state marine reserves, and state marine conservation areas. The Fish and Game Commission shall consult with, and secure concurrence from, the State Parks and Recreation Commission prior to modifying or deleting state marine reserves and state marine conservation areas designated by the State Parks and Recreation Commission. The Fish and Game Commission shall not delete or modify state marine recreational management areas designated by the State Parks and Recreation Commission.

(b) The State Parks and Recreation Commission may designate, delete, or modify state marine reserves, state marine parks, state marine conservation areas, state marine cultural preservation areas, and state marine recreational management areas. The State Parks and Recreation Commission may not designate, delete, or modify a state marine reserve, state marine park, or state marine conservation area without the concurrence of the Fish and Game Commission on any proposed restrictions upon, or change in, the use of living marine resources.

(c) If an unresolved conflict exists between the Fish and Game Commission and the State Parks and Recreation Commission regarding a state marine reserve, state marine park, or state marine conservation area, the Secretary of the Resources Agency may reconcile the conflict.

(d) The State Water Resources Control Board may designate, delete, or modify state water quality protection areas.

(e) The Fish and Game Commission, State Parks and Recreation Commission, and State Water Resources Control Board each may restrict or prohibit recreational uses and other human activities in the MMAs for the benefit of the resources therein, except in the case of restrictions on the use of living marine resources. Pursuant to this section, and consistent with Section 2860 of the Fish and Game Code, the Fish and Game Commission may regulate commercial and recreational fishing and any other taking of marine species in MMAs.

(f) (1) The Department of Fish and Game may manage state marine reserves, state marine conservation areas, state marine recreational management areas established for hunting purposes and, if requested by the State Water Resources Control Board, state water quality protection areas.

(2) The Department of Parks and Recreation may manage state marine reserves, state marine parks, state marine conservation areas, state marine cultural preservation areas, and state marine recreational management areas. Department authority over units within the state park system shall extend to units of the state MMAs system that are managed by the department.

(3) The State Water Resources Control Board and the California regional water quality control boards may take appropriate actions to protect state water quality protection areas. The State Water Resources Control Board may request the Department of Fish and Game or the Department of Parks and Recreation to take appropriate management action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 299.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

36750.

Any MMA in existence on January 1, 2002, that has not been reclassified in accordance with the Marine Life Protection Act (Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 2850) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), shall be reclassified under the classification system described in Section 36700 by January 1, 2003, based upon the management purpose and level of resource protection at each site on January 1, 2002. Upon the reclassification of existing sites, but no later than January 1, 2003, the use of all other classifications shall cease for the marine and estuarine environments of the state, though the classifications may continue to be used for the terrestrial and freshwater environments where applicable. The reclassification process shall be the responsibility of the State Interagency Coordinating Committee established pursuant to Section 36800, and shall occur to the extent feasible in conjunction and consistent with the MMA master planning process created pursuant to the Marine Life Protection Act (Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 2850) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36800.

The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall establish and chair the State Interagency Coordinating Committee, whose members are representatives from those state agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and conservancies with jurisdiction or management interests over marine managed areas, including, but not limited to, the Department of Fish and Game, Department of Parks and Recreation, California Coastal Commission, State Water Resources Control Board, and State Lands Commission. The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall designate additional members of the committee. The committee shall review proposals for new or amended MMAs to ensure that the minimum required information is included in the proposal, to determine those state agencies that should review the proposal, and to ensure consistency with other such designations in the state. The committee shall also serve to ensure the proper and timely routing of site proposals, review any proposed site-specific regulations for consistency with the state system as a whole, and conduct periodic reviews of the statewide system to evaluate whether it is meeting the mission and statement of objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36850.

Designation guidelines based on the classification goals adopted for the state system of MMAs shall be developed jointly by the appropriate managing agencies in cooperation with the committee on or before January 1, 2002. These guidelines shall be used to provide a general sense of requirements for designating a site in any particular classification, and may include characteristics such as uniqueness of the area or resource, biological productivity, special habitats, cultural or recreational values, and human impacts to the area. These designation guidelines shall be provided on a standard set of instructions for each classification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36870.

On or before January 1, 2002, the committee shall establish a standard set of instructions for each classification to guide organizations and individuals in submitting proposals for designating specific sites or networks of sites. On or before January 1, 2003, the relevant site proposal guidelines shall be adopted by each designating entity.

(a) At a minimum, each proposal shall include the following elements for consideration for designation as an MMA:

(1) Name of individual or organization proposing the designation.

(2) Contact information for the individual or organization, including contact person.

(3) Proposed classification.

(4) Proposed site name.

(5) Site location.

(6) Need, purpose, and goals for the site.

(7) Justification for the manner in which the proposed site meets the designation criteria for the proposed classification.

(8) A general description of the proposed site’s pertinent biological, geological, and cultural resources.

(9) A general description of the proposed site’s existing recreational uses, including fishing, diving, boating, and waterfowl hunting.

(b) The following elements, if not included in the original proposal, shall be added by the proposed managing agency in cooperation with the individual or organization making the proposal, prior to a final decision regarding designation:

(1) A legal description of the site boundaries and a boundary map.

(2) A more detailed description of the proposed site’s pertinent biological, geological, cultural, and recreational resources.

(3) Estimated funding needs and proposed source of funds.

(4) A plan for meeting enforcement needs, including on-site staffing and equipment.

(5) A plan for evaluating the effectiveness of the site in achieving stated goals.

(6) Intended educational and research programs.

(7) Estimated economic impacts of the site, both positive and negative.

(8) Proposed mechanisms for coordinating existing regulatory and management authority, if any exists, within the area.

(9) An evaluation of the opportunities for cooperative state, federal, and local management, where the opportunities may exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36900.

Individuals or organizations may submit a proposal to designate an MMA directly through the committee or an appropriate designating entity. Proposals submitted to a designating entity shall be forwarded to the committee to initiate the review process. Proposals for designating, deleting, or modifying MMAs may be submitted to the committee or a designating entity at any time. The committee and scientific review panel established pursuant to subdivision (b) shall annually consider and promptly act upon proposals until an MPA master plan is adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2859 of the Fish and Game Code, and thereafter, no less than once every three years. Upon adoption of a statewide MPA plan, subsequent site proposals determined by the committee to be consistent with that plan shall be eligible for a simplified and cursory review of not more than 45 days.

(a) The committee shall review proposals to ensure that the minimum required information is included in the proposal, to determine those state agencies that should review the proposal, and to ensure consistency with other designations of that type in the state. After initial review by the coordinating committee and appropriate agencies, the proposal shall be forwarded to a scientific review panel established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall establish a scientific review panel, with statewide representation and direction from the committee, to evaluate proposals for technical and scientific validity, including consideration of such things as site design criteria, location, and size. This panel, to the extent practical, shall be the same as the master plan team used in the process set forth in the Marine Life Protection Act (Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 2850) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code). Members shall maintain familiarity with the types and effectiveness of MMAs used in other parts of the world for potential application to California. Members shall be reimbursed reasonable costs to participate in the activities of the panel. Where feasible, advice shall be sought from the appropriate federal agencies and existing regional or statewide marine research panels and advisory groups. After review by the scientific review panel, the committee shall forward the proposal and any recommendations to the appropriate designating entity for a public review process.

(c) Designating entities shall establish a process that provides for public review and comment in writing and through workshops or hearings, consistent with the legal mandates applicable to designating entities. All input provided by the committee and scientific review panel shall be made available to the public during this process. Outreach shall be made to the broadest ocean and coastal constituency possible, and shall include commercial and sport fishing groups, conservation organizations, waterfowl groups and other recreational interests, academia, the general public, and all levels of government.

(d) This process does not replace the need to obtain the appropriate permits or reviews of other government agencies with jurisdiction or permitting authority.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering or impeding the process identified under the Marine Life Protection Act (Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 2850) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) or the actions of the master plan team described in that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 385, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. The California Ocean Resources Stewardship Act of 2000 [36970. - 36995.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [36970. - 36973.]

36970.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Ocean Resources Stewardship Act of 2000 (CORSA).

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36971.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Pacific Ocean and its rich and varied resources provide great environmental, economic, aesthetic, recreational, health, educational, and scientific benefits to the people of California and the nation. The 840-mile coastline and ocean enriches us through a marine economy of over $44 billion, in 2012 dollars, annually.

(b) Much of the quality of life and economic vibrancy supported by the state’s ocean resources depends on
 successful management of those resources, and successful management depends on an adequate understanding of the natural, ecological, oceanographic, and coastal processes and their interactions with varied human activities, including the impacts of climate change.

(c) The state is working to maintain and increase the benefits of its ocean resources to the public; a goal that increases the need for sound management and greater practical understanding of the state’s ocean and coastal resources.

(d) Although California is making progress in ocean management efforts, unsolved existing challenges also point to the need for greater improvements in management and the basic information needed for sound management. Examples of existing challenges include depressed populations of many species that are the targets of state and federally managed fisheries, pollution that results in beach and
 fishery closures, dredging and dredge spoils disposal necessary to keep the state’s ports competitive, changing ocean chemistry and ecological impacts resulting from climate change, and coastal erosion that threatens structures and reduces the quality of beaches.

(e) Beginning in 2006, California has developed and periodically updated California Climate Change Assessments that assess the impacts and risks from climate change and identify potential solutions focused on integrated action by California.

(f) As direct and indirect social, cultural, and economic impacts of climate change continue to amplify and worsen, governance across multiple government sectors, such as infrastructure, natural ecosystem protection, agriculture and aquaculture, and many others, will require a higher degree of coordination relative to developing new research and approaches for effective action. 

(g) State and federal agencies with ocean and coastal resource management responsibility often lack basic information on which to base decisions, and many management issues are broader than the mandates of individual agencies, and existing means for coordinating agency efforts need to be improved. The result can be ad hoc, short-term management decisions based on inadequate information.

(h) California has a wealth of outstanding public and private marine science institutions that have increased their commitments to excellence in applied ocean resource science. Approximately one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in current, recent, or planned marine science projects funded by the federal government, foundations, the University of California and California State University systems, and private institutions could be of great benefit to the state’s coastal and ocean resource
 management agencies.

(i) The obstacles to collaborative efforts involving those institutions and agencies include all of the following:

(1) Inadequate coordination among marine science institutions.

(2) Inadequate guidance from management agencies about information needs for management.

(3) Important gaps in information, duplication of effort, missed opportunities, and unusable information due to the lack of standardized and coordinated information management techniques. The circumstances and needs identified in the findings in this section are among those recognized in this chapter and in the 1997 report prepared by the Resources Agency entitled “California’s Ocean Resources: An Agenda for the Future.” This chapter is intended to address some of the
 basic objectives of that report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 208, Sec. 1.   (AB 2287)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

36972.

The Legislature further finds that it is the policy of the state to do all of the following:

(a) Ensure adequate coordination of ocean resources management science among state, regional, and federal agencies and marine science institutions, including, but not limited to, science related to climate change mitigation and adaptation.

(b) Ensure the most efficient and effective use of state resources devoted to ocean resource management science and encourage the contribution of federal and nongovernmental resources.

(c) Advance applied ocean science, graduate-level education, and technology development to meet current and
 future California ocean resource management needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 208, Sec. 2.   (AB 2287)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

36973.

(a) No authority is established by this chapter, nor shall any of its purposes or provisions be used by any public or private agency or person, to delay or deny any existing or future project or activity.

(b) No authority is established by this chapter to supersede current state agency statutory authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [36979. - 36979.]

36979.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Ocean resources” means all living and nonliving resources found in the Pacific Ocean and its contiguous saline or brackish bays and estuaries.

(b) “Trust” means the California Ocean Science Trust authorized by Section 36990.

(c) “Trustees” means the trustees of the trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 208, Sec. 3.   (AB 2287)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. California Ocean Science Trust [36990. - 36995.]

36990.

(a) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency may enter into an agreement with an existing nonprofit corporation with broad experience as the trustee of public funds, court-ordered mitigation funds, or other funds used to assist public agencies in carrying out their responsibilities to establish a nongovernmental trust, to be known as the California Ocean Science Trust.

(b) The purposes of the trust shall be all of the following:

(1) To seek funds for California ocean resource science projects, emphasizing the development of new funding sources.

(2) To fund
 California ocean resource science projects that help fulfill the missions of the state’s ocean resource management agencies.

(3) To encourage coordinated, multiagency, multiinstitution approaches to ocean resource science to deliver actionable science solutions that accelerate equitable climate change adaptation.

(4) To encourage graduate education programs, training, and workforce development opportunities in management-oriented ocean resource science in public and private universities and colleges in California.

(5) To encourage new technologies that reduce the cost, increase the amount, or improve the quality of ocean resource management information.

(6) To promote more effective coordination of California ocean resource science useful to management agencies.

(c) The trust may administer grants and expenditures of the trust for purposes consistent with this chapter from private and public fund sources, including, but not limited to, direct appropriations from the annual Budget Act and block grants from other state agencies with relevant need for coordination and engagement with the trust.

(d) (1) For the purpose of developing and providing peer reviews, technical guidance, or scientific reports and analyses to state agencies and departments with relevant need, the trust may engage with scientific experts through convenings, including panels, workshops, or symposia, to gain knowledge, solutions, and
 recommendations for topics consistent with subdivision (b).

(2) As funding allows, the trust shall develop an annual list of topics, consistent with subdivision (b), that the trust will undertake to deliver the content pursuant to paragraph (1) to state agencies and departments.

(e) (1) The Natural Resources Agency, the California Environmental Protection Agency, or an entity within the Natural Resources Agency or the California Environmental Protection Agency may enter into a direct agreement with the trust for the delivery of peer reviews, technical guidance, or scientific reports and
 analyses pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) As used in this subdivision, “entity” includes, but is not limited to, a department, board, commission, or conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 470, Sec. 2.   (SB 1324)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

36991.

The trust shall be subject to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law, Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code. To the extent of any conflict between this chapter and the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law, this division shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36992.

The trust shall have 10 trustees, who shall be appointed as follows:

(a) The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall appoint the following trustees, who shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary:

(1) One trustee who shall represent the Resources Agency and the departments and commissions within the Resources Agency with ocean resource management responsibilities and who may be an employee of the state.

(2) Three trustees from a list of candidates submitted jointly by the President of the University of California and the Chancellor of the California State University, who shall be chosen for their broad knowledge of ocean resource management and science. At least one of the three trustees shall not be an employee or on the faculty of the University of California or California State University.

(3) Two trustees who shall be representatives of the public selected primarily for their experience as trustees or directors of for-profit or nonprofit corporations.

(4) Two trustees from nominees submitted by coast and ocean interest groups including, but not limited to, interest groups representing sport fishing, commercial fishing, coast and ocean recreation and tourism, marine conservation, and ocean-dependent industries. In making the appointments pursuant to this paragraph, the factors to be considered shall include the nominees’ acceptability to a range of coast and ocean interests, and their experience as trustees or directors of for profit or nonprofit corporations.

(b) The Secretary for Environmental Protection shall appoint one trustee, who shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary, and who shall have broad knowledge of water quality concerns as they relate to ocean resource management.

(c) The Director of Finance shall appoint one trustee, who shall serve at the pleasure of the director.

(d) To the extent feasible, the trustees appointed to the trust pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall balance, and reflect the breadth of, public interests concerned with ocean resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36993.

(a) Any person who might reasonably be expected at some time to derive a direct financial benefit from the activities of the trust shall be ineligible to serve as a trustee.

(b) Subject to the approval of the Secretary for Resources, the trustees shall adopt definitions and rules for the trust with respect to indirect conflicts of interest.

(c) All trustees shall serve without compensation. However, trustees may be reimbursed by the trust for reasonable expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36994.

(a) The trust shall do all of the following:

(1) Expend funds only for the purposes of the trust enumerated in Section 36990 and as further restricted by the sources of the trust’s funding.

(2) Make written findings for funds committed for projects, indicating how the projects further the purposes of the trust enumerated in Section 36990.

(3) Require the recipient of funds to keep records necessary to disclose whether the funds were used for the purposes specified by the trust.

(4) Invest and manage the funds of the trust in accordance with the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).

(5) The trust shall report in writing annually to the Legislature and to the Chair of the Joint Committee on Fisheries and Aquaculture. The annual report shall include the most recent financial audit of the trust and the written findings required pursuant to paragraph (2). The activities of the trust for any financial year may be audited by the Bureau of State Audits.

(b) The trustees shall ensure that the trust, individual trustees acting on behalf of the trust and employees or agents of the trust do not engage in lobbying or contribute to, or otherwise support, any political party, candidate, or ballot issue.

(c) This chapter does not expand the authority of the trust to contract for professional services beyond the authority to contract for those services in Section 19130 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

36995.

(a) The trust may seek the assistance of advisers, form advisory committees, or otherwise consult with knowledgeable individuals in regard to the business of the trust.

(b) Advisers shall serve without compensation. However, advisers may be reimbursed by the trust for reasonable expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 28. NATURAL HERITAGE PRESERVATION TAX CREDIT ACT OF 2000 [37000. - 37042.]



CHAPTER 1. Intent [37000. - 37001.]

37000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the “Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Act of 2000.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

37001.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The continued economic development of California will be fostered and improved if conflicts over the use of natural resources can be resolved without litigation or disputes.

(b) The economic development of California can be facilitated if endangered species and other forms of plants, fish, and wildlife can be protected quickly and efficiently, so that development and agricultural use can proceed on other lands.

(c) Water allocation decisions could be eased if water could be provided for fish, wildlife, and aquatic and riparian habitat without objection by other water users.

(d) The intent of this division is to accommodate economic development and resolve land use and water disputes in a manner beneficial to all people in California, and to the benefit of California environmental quality.

(e) The further intent of this division is to foster partnerships between the public and private sectors to resolve disputes and promote economic growth and environmental quality.

(f) Conservation easements protect land, keep land in private ownership and on the tax rolls, and, where appropriate, are the preferred method to protect agricultural and habitat values.

(g) The value of wildlife habitat to the state is very high, especially in the case of implementing habitat conservation plans and multispecies conservation plans.

(h) Habitat stewardship shall be assisted and rewarded, and it is in the state’s interest to encourage landowners to perceive habitat as an asset rather than a liability.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this division, to provide an additional tool for the protection of wildlife habitat, open space, and agricultural lands. However, there continues to be a recognized need for additional funding sources for park, wildlife, and recreation facilities, as well as for the preservation of open space and agricultural lands.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this division to protect wildlife habitat, open space, and agricultural lands by providing up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in tax credits for donations of qualified land.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [37002. - 37002.]

37002.

As used in this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Approval” or “approval for acceptance” means the board’s approval of the granting of a tax credit for a donation of property pursuant to the program.

(b) “Board” means the Wildlife Conservation Board created pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1320) of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(c) “Conservation easement” means a conservation easement, as defined by Section 815.1 of the Civil Code, that is contributed in perpetuity.

(d) “Department” means any
 entity created by statute within the Natural Resources Agency and authorized to hold title to land, or the Natural Resources Agency.

(e) (1) “Designated nonprofit organization” means a nonprofit organization qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code that has as a principal purpose the conservation of land and water resources and that is designated by a local government or a department to accept property pursuant to this division in lieu of the local government or a department. In order to be eligible to receive a donation of property pursuant to this division, a nonprofit organization shall have experience in land conservation.

(2) If bond funds are used pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 37030), the designated nonprofit organization shall also meet the eligibility requirements specified in the relevant provision of
 the applicable bond act, for a nonprofit organization.

(f) “Donee” means any of the following:

(1) A department to which a donor has applied to donate property.

(2) A local government that has submitted a joint application with a department requesting approval of a donation of property to that local government.

(3) A local government that has submitted an application directly to the board.

(4) A designated nonprofit organization.

(g) “Donor” means a property owner that donates, or submits an application to donate, property pursuant to the program.

(h) (1) “Local government” means any city, county, city and county, or any district, as defined in Section 5902 or in Division 26 (commencing with Section 35100), or any joint powers authority made up of one or more of those entities or those entities and departments.

(2) If bond funds are used pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 37030), “local government” also includes any other local governmental entity eligible to receive bond funds pursuant to the relevant provision of the applicable bond act.

(i) “Program” means the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Program authorized by this division.

(j) “Property” means any real property, and any perpetual interest therein, including land, conservation easements, and land containing water rights, as well as water rights.

(k) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 220, Sec. 2.   (AB 94)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Program [37005. - 37006.]

37005.

The Wildlife Conservation Board shall implement the program. The board may request staff services from any department that submits an application and a proposal for a donation of property to the board.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37006.

(a) Under the program, upon approval by the board, a donor may contribute qualified property to a donee and receive a tax credit for a portion of the value of the property, as provided in Sections 17053.30 and 23630 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The board shall adopt guidelines or regulations to implement the program, including procedures for applications submitted pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 37010) and for the evaluation of properties proposed to be contributed pursuant to the program. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the guidelines or regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Procedures [37010. - 37014.]

37010.

Applications shall be submitted to the donee to which the donor proposes to contribute the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

37011.

At a minimum, each application shall contain all of the following:

(a) The identification of the donor and donee.

(b) A description of the property, including documentation of how the property meets the criteria and qualifies for acceptance under the program.

(c) A property appraisal meeting the requirements of Section 170 of Title 26 of the United States Code, setting forth the fair market value of the property.

(d) (1) A certification by the donor that the donor received no other valuable consideration for the donation of property.

(2) A certification by the donor that the contribution was not, and is not, required to satisfy a condition imposed upon the donor by any lease, permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement for use issued by one or more public agencies, including, but not limited to, the mitigation of significant effects on the environment of a project pursuant to an approved environmental impact report or mitigated negative declaration required pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(e) A certification by the donor that the application discloses any known or suspected environmental conditions associated with the property.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113) by Stats. 2000, Ch. 900, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

37012.

(a) Each donee shall evaluate applications submitted to it and prepare a plan for the board that sets forth the donee’s priorities for acquisition of property that qualifies under the program. Consistent with the criteria established for the program, each donee may use its own priority lists and procedures in determining which properties or types of properties shall be given priority.

(b) Each donee or the board may request that the applicant supply further information reasonably necessary to allow the donee or the board to evaluate the proposed donation. 

(c) The department may accept contributions of money from any taxpayer to pay or reimburse the costs of appraisal, escrow, title, and other transaction costs associated with the contribution of any particular property or set of properties, including any environmental assessments required by the department, and the costs of preparing any necessary management plan for the property or set of properties.
